test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_poovij_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - poovij+v2: # Ok, MLO; this is an odd paradigm - Sg Gen+Acc from contracted, further 3-syll. with n:nj-change. The other poovij-paradigm is contracted. 
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  poovij
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  puáhháá
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  puáhháá
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  puáhánjân
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  puáhánjist
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Com:  puáhánjáin
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  puáhháánjttáá
    poovij+v2+N+Ess:  puáhánjin
    poovij+v2+N+Par:  puáhánjid
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  puáhánjeh
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  puáhánjij
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  puáhánjijd
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  puáhánjáid
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  puáhánjijn
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [puáhánjijguin, puáhánjijgijn]
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  puáhánjijttáá

  Noun - poovij+v1: # ok, MLO - see also puáhháán-yaml with an odd mixed paradigm; here cons gradation v7:hh
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Nom: poovij
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Gen: puáhháá
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Acc: puáhháá
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Ill: puáhhái
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Loc: puáhhást
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Com: puáhháin
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Abe: puáhhááttáá
    poovij+v1+N+Ess: puáhánin
    poovij+v1+N+Par: puáhánid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Nom: puáhhááh
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Gen: puáhhái
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Acc: puáhháid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Ill: puáhháid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Loc: puáhháin
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Com: [puáhháiguin, puáhháigijn]
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Abe: puáhháittáá
    
